South Dakota, session 2026, SB38.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF SOUTH DAKOTA:
Section 1. That § 34A-2-125.1 be AMENDED:
34A-2-125.1. In addition to any other tax or fee levied by law, there is hereby
imposed on any concentrated animal feeding operation or any operation that processes or
stores manure or process wastewater and is required to operate under a water pollution
control permit pursuant to § 34A-2-36.2 or 34A-2-36.3 an annual fee as provided for in
this section and § 34A-2-125.2.
In the case of an operation with a water pollution control permit that includes a
nutrient management plan, other than a livestock auction, an operation located outside of
this state, or an operation located in Indian country, as defined in 40 C.F.R § 122.2 (April
21, 2020), the fee is based on the maximum permitted number of animals and is as
follows:
(1) $0.43 per mature dairy cow, milked or dry;
(2) $0.30 per other cattle or bison;
(3) $0.60 per horse;
(4) $0.03 per weaned swine less than fifty-five pounds;
(5) $0.12 per swine equal to or greater than fifty-five pounds;
(6) $0.03 per sheep or weaned lamb;
(7) $0.0055 per turkey;
(8) $0.0027 per chicken; and
(9) $0.01 per duck or goose.

26.384.10 2 38
An Act to modify the annual fee imposed on certain concentrated animal feeding operations.
Received at this Executive Office
I certify that the attached Act originated in this _____ day of _____________,
the:
2026 at ____________M.
Senate as Bill No. 38
By
Secretary of the Senate for the Governor
The attached Act is hereby
approved this ________ day of
President of the Senate ______________, A.D., 2026
Attest:
Governor
Secretary of the Senate
STATE OF SOUTH DAKOTA,
ss.
Office of the Secretary of State
Speaker of the House
Filed ____________, 2026
Attest: at _________ o'clock __M.
Chief Clerk of the House Secretary of State
Senate Bill No. 38 By
File No. ____ Asst. Secretary of State
Chapter No. ______
SB38 ENROLLED